130 • CHAPTER 5
The attitude of much of the public mirrored that of the Congress. At first, most Americans believed they were fighting not for independence but for a redress of grievances within the British Empire. During the first year of fighting, however, many of them began to change their minds, for several reasons. First, the costs of the war-human and financial-were so high that the original war aims began to seem too modest to justify them. Second, what lingering affection American Patriots retained for England greatly diminished when the British began trying to recruit Indians, African slaves, and foreign mercenaries (the hated Hessians) against them. Third, and most important, colonists came to believe that the British government was forcing them toward independence by rejecting the Olive Branch Petition and instead enacting a "Prohibitory Act/’ It closed the colonies to all overseas trade and made no concessions to American demands except an offer to pardon repentant rebels. The British enforced the Prohibitory Act with a naval blockade of colonial ports.
But the growing support for independence remained to a large degree unspoken until January 1776, when an impassioned pamphlet appeared that galvanized many Americans. It was called, simply, Common Sense. Its author, unmentioned on the title page, was thirty-eight-year-old Thomas Paine, who
THOMAS PAINE
Paine emigrated to America in 1774 and quickly became involved in the revolutionary circles in Philadelphia. Early in 1776, he published an anonymous pamphlet titled Common Sense, which called for an end to British rule in America. He served in the American army during the Revolution in New Jersey, while also writing additional tracts promoting independence. In later years, he joined the French Revolution and published The Rights of Man in 1791-1792. (©Corbis) had emigrated from England to America fifteen months before.
r	He barely survived the transatlantic voyage
Common Sense	y	'&
to America. For much of his life he lived in poverty, and he was ostracized because he openly ridiculed Christianity. But his pamphlets influenced the developing ideals of the United States. A failure in various trades, Paine now proved a brilliant success as a Revolutionary propagandist. His Common Sense helped change the American outlook toward the war. Paine wanted to turn the anger of Americans away from the specific parliamentary measures they were resisting and toward what he considered the root of the problem-the English constitution itself. It was not enough, he argued, for Americans to continue blaming their problems on particular ministers, or even on Parliament. It was the king, and the system that permitted him to rule, that was to blame. It was, he argued, simple common sense for Americans to break completely with a government that could produce so corrupt a monarch as George III, a government that could inflict such brutality on its own people, a government that could drag Americans into wars in which America had no interest. The island kingdom of England was no more fit to rule the American continent, Paine claimed, than a satellite was fit to rule the sun.
The Decision for Independence
Common Sense sold more than 100,000 copies in its first few months. To many of its readers it was a revelation. Although sentiment for independence remained far from unanimous, support for the idea grew rapidly in the first months of 1776.
At the same time, the Continental Congress was moving slowly and tentatively toward a final break with England. It declared American ports open to the ships of all nations except Great Britain’s. It entered into communication with for-
eign powers, it recommended to the various colonies that they establish new governments independent of the British Empire as most already were doing. Congress also appointed a commit tee to draft a formal declaration of independence. On July 2 1776, it adopted a resolution: "That these United Colonies are and, of right, ought to be, free and independent states; thai jHE	they are absolved from all allegiance tc
Declaration of r^e British crown, and that all politica Independence connexion between them and the state o:
Great Britain is, and ought to be, totally dissolved. Two days later, on July 4, Congress approved the
Declaration of Independence, which provided the formal justi fications for the actions the delegates had in fact taken twc days earlier.
Thomas Jefferson, a thirty-three-year-old delegate from Virginia, wrote most of the Declaration, with help from Benjamin Franklin and John Adams. As Adams later observed, Jefferson said little in the document that was new. Its power lay in the eloquence with which it expressed beliefs already widespread in America. In particular, it repeated ideas that had been voiced throughout the colonies in the preceding months in the form of at least ninety local "declarations of independence”-declarations
drafted up and down the coast by town meetings, artisan and militia organizations, county officials, grand juries, Sons of Liberty, and colonial assemblies. Jefferson borrowed heavily from these texts, both for the ideas he expressed and, to some extent, for the precise language he used.
The document was in two parts. In the first, the Declaration restated the familiar contract theory of John Locke: that governments were formed to protect the rights of life, liberty, and property; Jefferson gave the theory a more idealistic tone by replacing "property” with "the pursuit of happiness.” In the second part, the Declaration listed the alleged crimes of the king, who, with the backing of Parliament, had violated his "contract” with the colonists and thus had forfeited all claim to their loyalty.
The Declaration’s ringing endorsement of the idea that "all men are created equal”-a phrase borrowed from an earlier document by Jefferson’s fellow Virginian George Mason-later helped inspire movements of liberation and reform of many kinds in the United States and abroad, among them the French Revolution’s own Declaration of the Rights of Man. More immediately, the Declaration-and its bold claim that the American colonies were now a sovereign nation, "The United States of America”-led to increased foreign aid for the struggling rebels and prepared the way for France’s intervention on their side. The Declaration also encouraged American Patriots, as those opposing the British called themselves, to fight on and to reject the idea of a peace that stopped short of winning independence. At the same time, it created deep divisions within American society.
Responses to Independence
At the news of the Declaration of Independence, crowds in Philadelphia, Boston, and other places gathered to cheer, fire guns and cannons, and ring church bells. But there were many in America who did not rejoice. Some had disapproved of the war from the beginning. Others had been willing to support it only so long as its aims did not conflict with their basic loyalty to the king. Such people were a minority, but a substantial one. They called themselves Loyalists; supporters of independence called them Tories.
In the aftermath of the Declaration of Independence, the colonies began to call themselves "states”—a reflection of their belief that each province was now in some respects a separate and sovereign entity. Even before the Declaration, colonies were beginning to operate independently of royal authority. Divided The Parliament ln London had suspended Americans representative government in America.
That suspension did not end colonial self-government. It increased it, since the colonial assemblies continued to meet, now independent of imperial law. After the Declaration of 1776, the former colonies marked their independence by writing formal constitutions for themselves. By 1781, most of the new states had produced such constitutions, which established republican governments. Some of these constitutions survived for many decades without signif-
icant change.
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
« 131 At the national level, however, the process of forming a government was more halting and less successful. For a time, Americans were uncertain whether they even wanted a real national government; the Continental Congress had not been much more than a coordinating mechanism, and virtually everyone considered the individual colonies (now states) the real centers of authority. Yet fighting a war required a certain amount of central direction. Americans began almost immediately to do something they would continue to do for more than two centuries: balance the commitment to state and local autonomy against the need for some centralized authority.
In November 1777, Congress adopted the Articles of Confederation (which were not finally ratified until 1781). They did little more than confirm the weak, decentralized system already in operation. The Continental Congress
Articles of would survive as the chief coordinating Confederation agency of the war effort. Its powers over the individual states would be very limited. Indeed, the Articles did not make it entirely clear that the Congress was to be a real government. As a result, the new nation had to fight a war for its own survival with a weak and uncertain central government, never sure of its
own legitimacy.
Mobilizing for War
The new governments of the states and the nation faced a series of overwhelming challenges: raising and organizing armies, providing them with supplies and equipment, and finding a way to pay for it all. Without access to the British markets on which the colonies had come to depend, finding necessary supplies was exceptionally difficult.
America had many gunsmiths, but they could not come close to meeting the wartime demand for guns and ammunition, let alone the demand for heavy arms. Although Congress created a government arsenal at Springfield, Massachusetts, in 1777, the Americans managed to manufacture only a small fraction of the equipment they needed. Instead, they relied heavily on weapons and materiel they were able to capture from the British. But they got most of their war supplies from European nations, mainly from France.
Financing the war proved in many ways the most nettle-some problem. Congress had no authority to levy taxes directly on the people; it had to requisition funds from the state governments. But hard money was scarce in America, and the states were little better equipped to raise it than Congress was. None of them contributed more than a small part of their expected share. Congress tried to raise money by selling longterm bonds, but few Americans could afford them and those who could generally preferred to invest in more-profitable ventures, such as privateering. In the end, the government had no choice but to issue paper money. Continental currency came from the printing presses in large and repeated batches. The states printed sizable amounts of paper currency of their own.
DEBATING THE PAST
The American Revolution
HP T T T"?
long-standing debate over the origins of the American Revolution has tended to reflect 1 jLI u two broad schools of interpretation. One sees the Revolution largely as a political and intellectual event and argues that the revolt against Britain was part of a defense of ideals and principles. The other views the Revolution as a social and economic phenomenon and contends that material interests were at its heart, The Revolutionary generation itself portrayed the conflict as a struggle over ideals, and their interpretation prevailed through most of the nineteenth century. But in the early twentieth century, historians influenced by the reform currents of the progressive era (1873-1920) began to identify social and economic forces that they believed had contributed to the rebellion. In a 1909 study of New York, Carl Becker wrote that two questions had shaped the Revolution: The first was the question of home rule; the second was the question ... of who should rule at home. Not only were the colonists fighting the British, they were also engaged in a kind of civil war, a contest for power between radicals and conservatives that led to the "democratization of American politics and society."
Other "progressive" historians elaborated on Becker's thesis. In The American Revolution Considered as a Social Movement (1926), J. Franklin Jameson argued that "many economic desires, many social aspirations, were set free by the political struggle, many aspects of society profoundly altered by the forces thus let loose." In a 1917 book, Arthur M. Schlesinger maintained that colonial merchants, motivated by their own interest in escaping the restrictive policies of British mercantilism, aroused American resistance in the 1760s and 1770s.
Beginning in the 1950s, a new generation of scholars began to re-emphasize the role of ideology and to de-em-phasize the role of economic interests. Robert E. Brown (in 1955) and Edmund S. Morgan (in 1956) both argued that most eighteenth-century white Americans shared basic political principles and that the social and economic conflicts the progressives had identified were not severe. The rhetoric of the Revolution, they suggested, was not propaganda but, rather, a real reflection of the colonists' ideas. Bernard Bailyn, in The Ideological Origins of the American Revolution (1967), demonstrated the complex roots of the ideas behind the Revolution and argued that this carefully constructed political stance was not a disguise for economic interests but a genuine ideology, rooted in deeply held convictions about rights and power,
By the late 1960s, however, a group of younger historians were challenging the ideological interpretation again by illuminating social and economic tensions within colonial society that they claimed helped shape the Revolutionary struggle. Jesse Lemisch and Dirk Hoerder
The result, predictably, was inflation. Prices rose to fantastic heights, and the value of paper money plummeted. Many Financing the American farmers and merchants began to War	prefer doing business with the British, who
could pay for goods in gold or silver coin. (That was one reason why George Washington’s troops suffered from severe food shortages at Valley Forge in the winter of 1777-1778; many Philadelphia merchants would not sell to them.) Congress tried and failed repeatedly to stem the inflationary spiral. In the end, the new American government was able to finance the war effort only by borrowing heavily from other nations.
After the first great surge of patriotism faded in 1775, few Americans volunteered for military service. As a result, the states had to resort to persuasion and force: to paying bounties to attract new recruits and to drafting them. Even when it was possible to recruit substantial numbers of militiamen, they re-General mained under the control of their respec-George	rive states. Congress quickly recognized
Washington the disadvantages of this decentralized system and tried, with some success, to correct it. In the spring of 1775, it created a Continental army with a single commander in chief. George Washington, the forty-three-year-old Virginia planter-aristocrat who had
commanded colonial forces during the French and Indian War, and-despite his defeat at the battle at Fort Necessity in 1754-possessed more experience than any other American-born officer available. He had also been an early advocate of independence. Above all, he was admired, respected, and trusted by nearly all Patriots. He was the unanimous choice of the delegates, and he took command in June 1775.
Congress had chosen well. Throughout the war, Washington never flagged, despite difficulties and discouragements that would have daunted a lesser man. There were serious problems of morale among soldiers who consistently received short rations and low pay. Open mutinies broke out in 1781 among the Pennsylvania and New Jersey troops. The Continental Congress always seemed too little interested in supplying him with manpower and equipment and too much interested in interfering with his conduct of military operations.
Washington had some shortcomings as a military commander. But he was, in the end, a great war leader. With the Foreign	°f foreign military experts such as the
Assistance Marquis de Lafayette from France and Baron von Steuben from Prussia, he succeeded in building and holding together an army of fewer than 10,000 men that, along with state militias, ultimately
pointed to the actions of mobs in colonial cities as evidence of popular resentment of both American and British elites. Joseph Ernst reemphasized the significance of economic pressures on colonial merchants and tradesmen. Gary Nash,

lnm 1 2 3	'<• »>' C
Jp Along	Ckplate Qoodbi?"*^ Q Aa»i	4 *	<Ubbin2 froo
T^keydoodi;;^ Aadihereir.eap0P,..Unflljl,
And every t,
aeyfeampe, ., ,(k. lJw „ u,^
Yaukey dowifc, Ac.
1	1 Hnle barret r<x>,
«n»de offerer,
I’1*
Ir’ ■*d*1,uie *Jubs. ■ And call’d ih« folk’together. -S'1 -Y an key doodle, Ac.
And there waa tapnln Wathington, i 'And gentlefolks ab-i«him,
| They fay■ he', j™.., £„ uriwt proud,
8I	He will not rid.- wiijjout (hem.
Yankcy dyuj|e, Ac.
He ajot him on hi* meeting clothe*, i UPOI • a‘M“,,S «W»B» jj He (s(th«..w,rlJ along in rows, la hendreh and i.< millions. Yanlc-y ddodie, he.
Theflimin;rtSSmt <’i Mi hit,
, Th -y look’d f.• taring fine ah, f wanted pick-iy to get,
To dve to mv J tv n »'i.
*’•	Y*.kiy doodle, Ac.
i I fee an vh:r fa tri of t,»t,
Ji’ii-i,-? grava* »< t-ioid pie. •AaVUnt, la taroa, tl-ep, y *te>Me 1 th.-/ ih »i* 1 hgld me.' r Tank:/ daodle, &6.
ta fo 1 hook'll It off, iftfipv as I remember, re’ll ahull- 'till l got home,
0*4 up in mothet-’a chamber, Yankay doodle, &t.
doodle
^takhere «e fte a thoufind Jfiiulie David.
Ttte’fifej&greaienwy day,
4n ’ wloter t
f- <•
(Md ttaftn ftp a {Wimping gao,
*	A load for fetlurii cutie.
'Thnkcy doodle, itc.
Ariowtjr tfae thsy fo>01 k„ff, Itirtwafcornofporder,
And nuke* a note like father1* gu n, a^iwtioatonte. 6 >■*" , Yaokey doodle, St«
IwsntMiJgk to onemyfclf,
Aadfufaf sr«nt w nigh again,
It^httkadnct. wnin him.
Yaafcay doodle, ki.
it r
=aS£$S- ;
•	■■■■..,. ..................
D
The Granger Collection, New York) in The Urban Crucible (1979), emphasized the role of growing economic distress in colonial cities in creating a climate in which Revolutionary sentiment could flourish.
Some newer social interpretations of the Revolution attempt to break free of the old debate pitting ideas against interests. The two things are not in competition with but, rather, reinforce each other, more-recent scholars argue. "Everyone has economic interests," Gary Nash has written, "and everyone... has an ideology." Only by exploring the relationships between the two can historians hope fully to understand either. Also, as Linda Kerber has written, newer interpretations have "reinvigorated the Progressive focus on social conflict between classes and extended it to include the experience not only of rich and poor but of a wide variety of interest groups, marginal communities, and social outsiders." That extension of focus to previously little-studied groups includes work by Mary Beth Norton on women, Silvia Frey on slaves, and Colin Calloway on Native Americans.
Gordon Wood, in The Radicalism of the American Revolution (1992) and Empire of Liberty (2009), helped revive a once-popular interpretation of the Revolution that had fallen out of fashion: that it was a genuinely radical event, which led to the breakdown of such long-standing patterns of society as deference, patriarchy, and traditional gender relations. Cass conflict and radical goals may not have caused the Revolution: but the Revolution had a profound, even radical, ideological impact on society nevertheless. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE,
AND EVALUATE
1.	How has the debate over the origins of the American Revolution shifted over time? What are some reasons for the changing interpretations?
2.	In what way was the American Revolution an ideological struggle?
3.	In what way was the American Revolution a social and economic conflict?
4.	Was the American Revolution a radical event?
Why or why not?
prevailed against the greatest military power in the world. Even more important in a new nation still unsure of either its purposes or its structure, with a central government both weak and divided, Washington provided the army-and the people-with a symbol of stability around which they could rally. He may not have been the most brilliant of the country’s early leaders, but in the crucial years of the war, at least, he was the most successful in holding the new nation together.
THE WAR FOR INDEPENDENCE
On the surface, at least, all the advantages in the military struggle between America and Great Britain appeared to lie with the British. They possessed the greatest navy and the best-equipped army in the world. They had access to the resources of an empire. They had a coherent structure of command. The Americans, by contrast, were struggling to create a new army and a new government at the same time that they were trying to fight a war.
Yet the United States had advantages that were not at first apparent. Americans were fighting on their own ground, while the English were far from home (and from their own resources).
American The American Patriots were, on the Advantages whole, deeply committed to the conflict;
the British people only halfheartedly supported the war. As Thomas Paine said at the time, "They cannot defeat an idea with an army.” Beginning in 1777, moreover, the Americans had the benefit of substantial aid from abroad, when the American war became part of a larger world contest in which Great Britain faced the strongest powers of Europe-most
notably France-in a struggle for imperial supremacy.
The American victory was not, however, simply the result
of these advantages-nor even of the remarkable spirit and resourcefulness of the people and the army. It was a result, too, of a series of egregious blunders and miscalculations by the British in the early stages of the fighting, when England could (and probably should) have won. And it was, finally, a result of the transformation of the war-which proceeded in three different phases-into a new kind of conflict that the British military, for all its strength, could not win.
The First Phase: New England
For the first year of the fighting, the British remained uncertain about whether or not they were actually engaged in a
• 133
134 * CHAPTER 5
VOTING FOR INDEPENDENCE
The Continental Congress actually voted in favor of independence from Great Britain on July 2, 1776. July 4, the date Americans now celebrate as Independence Day, is when the Congress formally ratified the Declaration of Independence. This painting by Edgar Pine-Savage re-creates the scene in Philadelphia as delegates from the various colonies made their momentous decision. (© Philadelphia History Museum at the Atwater Kent/Courtesy of Historical Society of Pennsylvania Collection,/The Bridgeman Art Library) war. Many English authorities continued to believe that British forces were simply attempting to quell pockets of rebellion in the contentious area around Boston. Gradually, however, colonial forces took the offensive and made almost the entire territory of the American colonies a battleground.
After the British withdrawal from Concord and Lexington in April 1775, American forces besieged the army of General
Bunker Hill Thomas Gage in Boston. The Patriots suffered severe casualties in the Battle of
Bunker Hill (actually fought on Breed’s Hill) on June 17, 1775, and were ultimately driven from their position there. But they inflicted much greater losses on the enemy than the enemy inflicted on them. Indeed, the British suffered their heaviest casualties of the entire war at Bunker Hill. After the battle, the Patriots continued to tighten the siege.
By the first months of 1776, the British had concluded that Boston was not the best place from which to wage war. Not only was it in the center of the most fervently anti-British
region of the colonies, it was also tactically indefensible a narrow neck of land, easily isolated and besieged. By late winter, in fact, Patriot forces had surrounded the city and occupied strategic positions on the heights. On March 17, 1776 (a date still celebrated in Boston as Evacuation Day), the British departed Boston for Halifax in Nova Scotia with hundreds of Loyalist refugees. Less than a year after the firing of the first shots, the Massachusetts colonists had driven the British-temporarily-from American soil.
Elsewhere, the war proceeded fitfully and inconclusively. To the south, at Moore’s Creek Bridge in North Carolina, a band of Patriots crushed an uprising of Loyalists on February 27, 1776, and in the process discouraged a British plan to invade the southern states. The British had expected substantial aid from local Tories in the South; they realized now that such aid might not be as effective as they had hoped. To the north, Americans launched an invasion of Canada—hoping to remove the British threat and win the Canadians to their cause. Benedict Arnold, the
REVOLUTIONARY SOLDIERS
Jean Baptiste de Verger, a nineteen-year-old French officer serving in America during the Revolution, kept a journal of his experiences illustrated with watercolors. Here he portrays four American soldiers carrying different kinds of arms: a black infantryman with a light rifle, a musketman, a rifleman, and an artilleryman. (© Anne S.K, Brown Military Collection, Brown University Library) Invasion of commander of a small American force, Canada	threatened Quebec in late 1775 and early
1776 after a winter march of incredible hardship. Richard Montgomery, coming to his assistance, combined his forces with Arnold's and took command of both. Montgomery died in the assault on the city; and although a wounded Arnold kept up the siege for a time, the Quebec campaign ended in frustration. Congress sent a civilian commission to Canada, headed by the seventy-year-old Benjamin Franklin. But Franklin also failed to win the allegiance of the northern colonists. Canada did not become part of the new nation.
The British evacuation of Boston in 1776 was not, therefore, so much a victory for the Americans as a reflection of changing English assumptions about the war. By the spring of 1776, it had become clear to the British that England must be prepared to fight a much larger and longer conflict. The departure of the British, therefore, signaled the beginning of a new phase in the war.
The Second Phase:
The Mid-Atlantic Region
The next phase of the war, which lasted from 1776 until early 1778, was when the British were in the best position to win.
Indeed, had it not been for a series of blunders and misfortunes, they probably would have crushed the rebellion then. During this period the struggle became, for the most part, a traditional, conventional war. And in that, the Americans were woefully overmatched.
The British regrouped quickly after their retreat from Boston. During the summer of 1776, in the weeks immediately following the Declaration of Independence, the waters around New York City grew crowded with the most formidable military force Great Britain had ever sent abroad. Hundreds of man-of-war vessels and troopships and 32,000 disciplined soldiers arrived, under the command of the affable William Howe. Howe felt no particular hostility toward the Americans. He hoped to awe them into submission rather than fight them, and he believed that most of them, if given a chance, would show their loyalty to the king. In a meeting with commissioners from Congress, he offered them a choice between submission with royal pardon and a battle against overwhelming odds.
To oppose Howe’s impressive array, Washington could muster only about 19,000 poorly armed and lightly trained soldiers, even after combining the Continental army with state militias; he had no navy at all. Even so, the Americans quickly
136
CHAPTER 5
THE BATTLE OF GERMANTOWN
The Battle of Germantown, a campaign intended by Washington to liberate Philadelphia from British occupation, took place on October 4, 1777. In this painting by Alonzo Chappel (1828-1887), Battle of Germantown, Attack on Judge Chews House (1860), Washington's much larger force cannot defeat the 120 British infantrymen who barricaded themselves in the summer home of Loyalist Benjamin Chew. Twelve thousand American troops were forced to retreat into nearby Montgomery County. (© Chicago History Museum, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library) British Take rejected Howe’s offer and chose to con-
New York tinue the war-a decision that led inevitably to a succession of rapid defeats. The
British pushed the defenders off Long Island, compelled them to abandon Manhattan, and then drove them in slow retreat over the plains of New Jersey, across the Delaware River, and into Pennsylvania.
For eighteenth-century Europeans, warfare was a seasonal activity. Fighting generally stopped in cold weather. The British settled down for the winter at various points in New Jersey, leaving an outpost of Hessians (German mercenaries) at Trenton on the Delaware River. But Washington did not sit still. On Christmas night 1776, he boldly recrossed the icy river, surprised and scattered the Hessians, and occupied the town. Then he advanced to Princeton and drove a British force from their base in the college there. But Washington was unable to hold either
Princeton or Trenton, and he finally took refuge for the rest of the winter in the hills around Morristown, New Jersey.
For their campaigns of 1777, the British devised a strategy to cut the United States in two. Howe would move north from Britain’s	New York City up the Hudson to Albany,
Strategy	while another British force would come
south from Canada to meet him. One of the younger British officers, the dashing John Burgoyne, secured command of this northern force and planned a two-pronged attack along both the Mohawk and the upper Hudson approaches
to Albany.
But after setting this plan in motion, Howe himself abandoned it. He decided instead to launch an assault on the rebel capital Philadelphia-an assault that would, he hoped, discourage the Patriots, rally the Loyalists, and bring the war to a speedy conclusion. He removed the bulk of his forces from
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
® 137 British forces American forces British victory
THE REVOLUTION IN THE NORTH, 1775-1776
After initial battles in and around Boston, the British forces left Massachusetts and (after a brief stay in Halifax, Canada) moved south to New York. In the meantime, American forces moved north in an effort to capture British strongholds in Montreal and Quebec, with little success. • Why would the British have considered New York a better base than Boston?
New York by sea, landed at the head of the Chesapeake Bay, brushed Washington aside at the Battle of Brandywine Creek on September 11, and proceeded north to Philadelphia, which he was able to occupy with little resistance. Meanwhile, Washington, after an unsuccessful October 4 attack at Germantown (just outside Philadelphia), went into winter quarters at Valley Forge. The Continental Congress, now dislodged from its capital, reassembled at York, Pennsylvania.
Howe’s move to Philadelphia left Burgoyne to carry out the campaign in the north alone. Burgoyne sent Colonel Barry St. Leger up the St. Lawrence River toward Lake Ontario and the headwaters of the Mohawk, while Burgoyne himself advanced directly down the upper Hudson Valley. He got off to a flying start. He seized Fort Ticonderoga easily and with it an enormous store of powder and supplies; this caused such dismay in Congress that the delegates removed General Philip Schuyler from command of American forces in the north and replaced him with Horatio Gates.
By the time Gates took command, Burgoyne had already experienced two staggering defeats. In one of them-at Oriskany, New York, on August 6-a Patriot band of German farmers led by Nicholas Herkimer held off a force of Indians and Tories commanded by St. Leger. That gave Benedict
Arnold time to go to the relief of Fort Stanwix and close off the Mohawk Valley to St. Leger’s advance.
In the other battle-at Bennington, Vermont, on August 16-New England militiamen under the Bunker Hill veteran John Stark severely mauled a British detachment that Burgoyne had sent out to seek supplies. Short of materials, with all help cut off, Burgoyne fought several costly engagements and then withdrew to Saratoga, where Gates surrounded him. On October 17, 1777, Burgoyne ordered what was left of his army, nearly 5,000 men, to surrender to the Americans.
To the Patriots and peoples watching from around the Patriot world, the New York campaign was a remarkable victory. The British surrender at Saratoga became a major turning point in the war-above all, perhaps, because it led
directly to an alliance between the United States and France.
The British failure to win the war during this period, a period in which they had overwhelming advantages, was in large part
Victory at Saratoga
British
a result of their own mistakes. And in assess-
Blunders ing them, the role of William Howe looms large. He abandoned his own most important strategic initiative-the northern campaign-leaving Burgoyne to fight alone. And even in Pennsylvania, where he chose to
138 * CHAPTER 5
THE BATTLE OF BUNKER HILL, 1775
British troops face Patriot forces outside Boston on June 17, 1775, in the first great battle of the American Revolution. The British ultimately drove the Americans from their positions on Breed’s Hill and Bunker Hill, but only after suffering enormous casualties. General Gage, the British commander, reported to his superiors in London after the battle: "These people show a spirit and conduct against us they never showed against the French.” This anonymous painting reveals the array of British troops and naval support and also shows the bombardment and burning of Charles Town from artillery in Boston. (Private Collection/© Peter Newark American Pictures/Bridgeman Images) engage the enemy, he refrained from moving in for a final attack on the weakened Continental army, even though he had several opportunities. Instead, he repeatedly allowed Washington to retreat and regroup; and he permitted the American army to spend a long winter unmolested in Valley Forge, where-weak and hungry-they might have been easy prey for a British attack. Some British critics believed that Howe did not want to win the war, that he was secretly in sympathy with the American cause. His family had close ties to the colonies, and he was linked politically to those forces within the British government that opposed the war. Others pointed to personal weaknesses: Howe’s apparent alcoholism, his romantic attachment (he spent the winter of 1777-1778 in Philadelphia with his mistress when many of his advisers were urging him to move elsewhere). But the most important problem, it seems clear, was his failure to understand the nature of the war that he was fighting-or even to understand that it was truly a war.
The Iroquois and the British
The campaign in upstate New York was not just a British defeat. It was also a setback for the ambitious efforts of several
Iroquois leaders, who had hoped to involve Indian forces in the English military effort, believing that a British victory would help stem white movement onto tribal lands. The Iroquois Confederacy had declared itself neutral in the war in 1776, but not all its members were content to remain passive in the northern campaign. Among those who worked to expand the Native American role in the war were a Mohawk brother and sister, Joseph Brant and Mary Brant. Both were people of stature within the Mohawk nation: Joseph was a celebrated warrior; Mary was a charismatic woman and the widow of Sir William Johnson, the British superintendent of Indians, who had achieved wide popularity among the tribes. The Brants persuaded their own tribe to contribute to the British cause and attracted the support of the Seneca and Cayuga as well. They played an important role in Burgoyne’s unsuccessful campaigns in the north.
But the alliance was also a sign of the growing divisions within the Iroquois Confederacy. Only three of the six nations of the Confederacy supported the British. The Oneida and the Tuscarora backed the Americans; the Onondaga split into several factions. The three-century-old
Divisions in the Iroquois Confederacy
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION * 139
THE REVOLUTION IN THE MIDDLE COLONIES, 1776-1778
These maps illustrate the major campaigns of the Revolution in the middle colonies—New York, New Jersey, and Pennsylvania—between 1776 and 1778. The large map on the left shows the two prongs of the British strategy: first, a movement of British forces south from Canada into the Hudson Valley; and second, a movement of other British forces, under General William Howe, out from New York and south into New Jersey and Pennsylvania. The strategy was designed to trap the American army between the two British movements. The two smaller maps on the right show detailed pictures of some of the major battles. The upper one reveals the surprising American victory at Saratoga. The lower one shows a series of inconclusive battles between New York and Philadelphia in 1777 and 1778. * What movements of Howe helped thwart that plan?
Confederacy, weakened by the aftermath of the French and Indian War, continued to unravel.
The alliance had other unhappy consequences for the Iroquois. A year after Oriskany, Indians joined British troops in a series of raids on outlying white settlements in upstate New York. Months later, Patriot forces under the command of General John Sullivan harshly retaliated, wreaking such destruction on tribal settlements that large groups of Iroquois fled north into Canada to seek refuge. Many never returned.
Securing Aid from Abroad
The failure of the British to crush the Continental army in the mid-Atlantic states, combined with the stunning American victory at Saratoga, was a turning point in the war. It transformed the conflict and ushered it into a new and final phase.
Central to this transformation of the war was American success in winning support from abroad-indirectly from several European nations and directly from France. Even before the Declaration of Independence, Congress dispatched representatives to the capitals of Europe to negotiate commercial treaties with the governments there; if America was to leave the British Empire, it would need to cultivate new trading partners. Such Militia treaties would, of course, require European
Diplomats governments to recognize the United States as an independent nation. John Adams called the early American representatives abroad "militia diplomats/’ Unlike the diplomatic regulars of Europe, they had little experience with the formal art and etiquette of Old World diplomacy. Since transatlantic communication was slow and uncertain (it took from one to three months for a message to cross the Atlantic), they had to interpret the instructions of Congress
very freely and make crucial decisions entirely on their own.
140 ® CHAPTER 5
The most promising potential ally for the United States was France. King Louis XVI, who had come to the throne in 1774, and his astute foreign minister, the Count de Vergennes, were eager to see Britain lose a crucial part of its empire. Through a series of secret bargains, facilitated by the creation of a fictional trading firm and the use of secret agents on both sides (among them the famed French dramatist Caron de Beaumarchais), France began supplying the Americans large quantities of much-needed supplies. But the French government remained reluctant to provide the United States with what it most wanted: diplomatic recognition.
Finally, Benjamin Franklin himself went to France to represent the United States. A natural diplomat, Franklin became a popular hero among the French-aristocrats and common people alike. His popularity there greatly helped the American cause. Of even greater help was the news of the American victory at Saratoga, which arrived in London on December 2, 1777, and in Paris two days later. On February 6, 1778-in part to forestall a British peace offensive that Vergennes feared might persuade the Americans to abandon the war-France formally recognized the United States as a sovereign nation and laid the groundwork for greatly expanded assistance to the American war effort.
France’s intervention made the war an international conflict. In the course of the next two years, France, Spain, and the Pivotal Netherlands all drifted into another general
French Aid war with Great Britain in Europe, and all contributed both directly and indirectly to the ultimate American victory. But France was America’s truly indispensable ally. Not only did it furnish the new nation with most of its money and munitions; it also provided a navy and an expeditionary force that proved invaluable in the decisive
phase of the Revolutionary conflict.
The Final Phase: The Sooth
The last phase of the military struggle in America was very different from either of the first two. The British government had never been fully united behind the war; after the defeat at Saratoga and the intervention of the French, it imposed new limits on its commitment to the conflict. Instead of a full-scale military struggle against the American army, therefore, the British decided to try to enlist the support of those elements of the American population-a majority, they continued to believe-who were still loyal to the Crown; in other words, they would work to undermine the Revolution from within. Since the British believed Loyalist sentiment was strongest in the southern colonies (despite their earlier failure to enlist Loyalist support in North Carolina), the main focus of their effort shifted there; and so it was in the South, for the most part, that the final stages of the war occurred.
The new British strategy was a dismal failure. British forces spent three years (from 1778 to 1781) moving through the South, fighting small battles and large, and attempting to neutralize the territory through which they traveled. All
such efforts ended in frustration. The British badly overestimated the extent of Loyalist sentiment. There were many Tories in Georgia and the Carolinas, some of them disgruntled members of the Regulator movement. But there were also many more Patriots than the British had believed. In Virginia, support for independence was as fervent as in Massachusetts. And even in the lower South, Loyalists often
refused to aid the British because they feared reprisals from the Patriots around them. The British also harmed their own cause by encouraging southern slaves to desert their owners in return for promises of emancipation. Many slaves (perhaps 5 percent of the total) took advantage of this offer, despite the great difficulty of doing so. But white southerners were aghast; and even many who might otherwise have been inclined to support the Crown now joined the Patriot side, which posed no such threat to slavery. The British also faced severe logistical problems in the South. Patriot forces could move at will throughout the region, living off the resources of the countryside, blending in with the civilian population and leaving the British unable to distinguish friend from foe. The British, by contrast, suffered all the disadvantages of an army in hostile territory.
It was this phase of the conflict that made the war truly "revolutionary”-not only because it introduced a new kind of combat, but also because it had the effect of mobilizing and politicizing large groups of the population who had previously remained aloof from the struggle. With the war expanding into previously isolated communities, with many civilians forced to involve themselves whether they liked it or not, the political climate of the United States grew more heated than ever. And support for independence, far from being crushed as the British had hoped, greatly increased.
That was the context in which the important military encounters of the last years of the war occurred. In the North, where significant numbers of British troops remained, the fighting settled into a relatively quiet stalemate. Sir Henry Clinton replaced the hapless William Howe in 1778 and moved what had been Howe’s army from Philadelphia back to New York City. There the British troops stayed for more than a
year, with Washington using his army to keep watch around them. The American forces in New York did so little fighting in this period that Washington sent some troops west to fight hostile Indians who had been attacking white settlers. In that same winter, George Rogers Clark, under orders from the state of Virginia-not from either Washington or Congress led a daring expedition over the mountains and captured settlements in the Illinois country from the British and their Indian allies.
During this period of relative calm, General Benedict Arnold shocked the American forces-and Washington in particular by becoming a traitor. Arnold had been one of the early heroes of the war, but now, convinced that the American cause was
ope ess, he conspired with British agents to betray the Patriot
Revolutionary Consequences of the Southern Campaign
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION * 141
<	--- British forces
•<— American forces
<	--- French fleet
British victory American victory
\ D'ESTAING \ Sept.-Oct. 1779
THE REVOLUTION IN THE SOUTH, 1778-1781
The final phase of the American Revolution occurred largely in the South, which the British thought would be a more receptive region for their troops. This map reveals the many, scattered military efforts of the British and the Americans in those years, none of them conclusive. It also shows the final chapter of the Revolution around the Chesapeake Bay and the James River. * What errors led the British to their surrender at Yorktown?
stronghold at West Point on the Hudson River. The scheme unraveled before Arnold could complete it, and he fled to the safety of the British camp, where he spent the rest of the war.
In the meantime, decisive fighting was in progress in the South. The British did have some significant military successes during this period. On December 29, 1778, they captured Savannah, on the coast of Georgia; and on May 12, 1780, they took the port of Charles Town, South Carolina. They also inspired some Loyalists to take up arms and advance with them into the interior. But although the British were able to win conventional battles, they were constantly harassed as they
moved through the countryside by Patriot guerrillas led by such resourceful fighters as Thomas Sumter, Andrew Pickens, and Francis Marion, the "Swamp Fox.”
Moving inland to Camden, South Carolina, Lord Cornwallis (Clinton’s choice as British commander in the South) met Nathanael anc^ crus^e^ a Patriot force under Horatio Greene Gates on August 16, 1780. Congress recalled Gates, and Washington gave the southern command to Nathanael Greene, a Quaker and a former blacksmith from Rhode Island and probably the ablest
of all the American generals of the time next to Washington.
142 • CHAPTER 5
THE BRITISH ON THE HUDSON, 1776
In one of the largest troop movements of the Revolution, English commanders sent 13,000 British and Hessian troops up the Hudson River to drive George Washington and his Patriot army from strongholds in the palisades above the river. The British took nearly 3,000 prisoners when the Patriots surrendered on November 16, 1776. Thomas Davies painted this watercolor of the British landing at the time. (© Fotosearch/Getty images)
Even before Greene joined the southern army, the tide of battle began to turn against Cornwallis. At King’s Mountain (near the North Carolina-South Carolina border) on October 7, 1780, a band of Patriot riflemen from the backwoods killed, wounded, or captured an entire force of 1,100 New York and South Carolina Tories that Cornwallis was using as auxiliaries. Once Greene arrived, he confused and exasperated Cornwallis further by dividing the American forces into small, fast-moving contingents and refraining from a showdown in open battle. One of the contingents inflicted what Cornwallis admitted was "a very unexpected and severe blow” at Cowpens on January 17, 1781. Finally, after receiving reinforcements, Greene combined all his forces and maneuvered to meet the British on ground of his own choosing, at Guilford Court House, North Carolina. After a hard-fought battle there on March 15, 1781, Greene withdrew from the field; but Cornwallis had lost so many men that he decided at last to abandon the Carolina campaign.
Cornwallis withdrew to the port town of Wilmington, North Carolina, to receive supplies being sent to him by sea; later he moved north to launch raids in the interior of Virginia.
But Clinton, concerned for the army’s safety, ordered him to take up a position on the peninsula between the York and James Rivers and wait for ships to carry his troops to New York City or Charles Town. So Cornwallis retreated to Yorktown and began to build fortifications there.
George Washington-along with Count Jean Baptiste de Rochambeau, commander of the French expeditionary force in America, and Admiral Francois Joseph Paul de Grasse, commander of the French fleet in American waters-set out to trap Yorktown Cornwallis at Yorktown. Washington and Rochambeau marched a French-American army from New York City to join other French forces under Lafayette in Virginia, while de Grasse sailed with additional troops for Chesapeake Bay and the York River. These joint operations, perfectly timed and executed, caught Cornwallis between land and sea. After a few shows of resistance, he capitulated on October 17, 1781 (four years to the day after the surrender of Burgoyne at Saratoga). Two days later, as a military band played the old tune "The World Turn’d Upside Down,” Cornwallis, claiming to be ill, sent a deputy who formally sur-
rendered the British army of more than 7,000 men.
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
• 143 Except for a few skirmishes, the fighting was now over; but the United States had not yet won the war. British forces continued to hold the seaports of Savannah, Charles Town, Wilmington, and New York City. Before long, a British fleet met and defeated Admiral de Grasse’s fleet in the West Indies, ending Washington’s hopes for further French naval assistance. For more than a year, although there was no significant further combat between British and American forces, it remained possible that the war might resume and the struggle for independence might still be lost.
Winning the Peace
Cornwallis’s defeat provoked outcries in England against continuing the war. Lord North resigned as prime minister; Lord Shelburne emerged from the political wreckage to succeed him; and British emissaries appeared in France to talk informally with the American diplomats in Paris. The three American principals were Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and John Jay.
The Americans were under instructions to cooperate fully with France in their negotiations with England. But Vergennes insisted that France could not agree to any settlement of the war with England until its ally Spain had achieved its principal war aim: winning back Gibraltar from the British. There was no real prospect of that happening soon, and the Americans began to fear that the alliance with France might keep them at war indefinitely. As a result, Franklin, Jay, and Adams began proceeding on their own, without informing Vergennes, and signed a preliminary treaty with Great Britain on November 30, 1782. Franklin, in the meantime, skillfully pacified Vergennes and avoided an immediate rift in the French-American alliance.
The British and Americans reached a final settlement-the Treaty of Paris-on September 3, 1783, when both Spain and France agreed to end hostilities. It was, on the whole, remark-Treaty of ably favorable to the United States in grant-Paris	ing a clear-cut recognition of its independence
and a generous, though ambiguous, cession of territory-from the southern boundary of Canada to the northern boundary of Florida and from the Atlantic to the Mississippi. With good reason, Americans celebrated in the fall of 1783 as the last of the British occupation forces embarked from New York and General Washington, at the head of his
troops, rode triumphantly into the city.
WAR AND SOCIETY
Historians have long debated whether the American Revolution was a social as well as a political revolution. Some have argued that the colonists were struggling not only over the question of home rule, but also over "who should rule at home.” Others claim that domestic social and economic concerns had little to do with the conflict. (See "Debating the Past, pp. 132-133.) Whatever the motivations of Americans, however, there can
be little doubt that the War for Independence had important effects on the nature of American society.
Loyalists and Minorities
The losers in the American Revolution included not only the British but also American Loyalists. There is no way to be sure how many Americans remained loyal to England during the Revolution, but it is clear that there were many-at least a fifth (and some historians estimate as much as a third) of the white population. Their motivations were varied. Some were officeholders in the imperial government, who stood to lose their positions as a result of the Revolution. Others were merchants engaged in trade closely tied to the imperial system. (Most merchants, however, supported the Revolution.) Still others were people who lived in relative isolation and had not been exposed to the wave of discontent that had turned so many Americans against Britain. There were cultural and ethnic minorities who feared that an independent America would not offer them sufficient protection. There were settled, cautious people who feared social instability. And there were those who, expecting the British to win the war, were simply currying favor with the anticipated victors.
What happened to these men and women during the war was a turbulent and at times tragic story. Hounded by Patriots in their communities, harassed by legislative and The Loyalists’ judicial actions, the position of many Plight	Loyalists became intolerable. Up to 100,000
fled the country. Those who could afford to moved to England, where many lived in difficult and lonely exile. Thomas Hutchinson, who was a wealthy businessman, historian, and loyalist of the king, served in the Massachusetts government for many years as lieutenant governor and from 1758 to 1774 as governor. He was a polarizing figure; and as the Revolution began, his Boston mansion was ransacked during protests against the Stamp Acts. After being replaced as governor in May 1774 by General Thomas Gage, Hutchinson left Boston and moved first to Canada and
then to England.
Loyalists of modest means moved to Canada, establishing the first English-speaking community in the province of Quebec. Some returned to America after the war and, as the earlier passions and resentments faded, managed to reenter the life of the nation. Others remained abroad for the rest of their lives.
Most Loyalists were people of average means, but a substantial minority consisted of men and women of wealth. They left behind large estates and vacated important positions of social and economic leadership. Even some who remained in the country saw their property confiscated and their positions forfeited. The result was new opportunities for Patriots to acquire land and influence, a situation that produced significant social changes in many communities.
It would be an exaggeration, however, to claim that the departure of the Loyalists was responsible for anything approaching a social revolution or that the Revolution created a general assault on the wealthy and powerful in America. When the war
The Age of Revolutions
pp y y y-j American Revolution was a result of specific tensions and conflicts between Britain
H E
and its North American colonies. But it was also a part, and a cause, of what historians have come to call an "age of revolutions" that spread through much of the Western world in the late eighteenth and early nineteenth centuries. The modern idea of revolution—the overturning of old systems and regimes and the creation of new ones—was largely a product of the ideas of the Enlightenment. Among those ideas was the
STORMING THE BASTILLE
This painting portrays the storming of the great Parisian fortress and prison, the Bastille, on July 14,1789. The Bastille was a despised symbol of royal tyranny to many of the French, because of the arbitrarily arrested and imprisoned people who were sent there. The July assault was designed to release the prisoners, but in fact the revolutionaries found only seven people in the vast fortress. Even so, the capture of the Bastille—which marked one of the first moments in which ordinary Frenchmen joined the Revolution—became one of the great moments in modern French history. The anniversary of the event, "Bastille Day," remains the French national holiday. (© Musee de la Ville de Paris, Musee Carnavalet, Paris, France/The Bridgeman Art Library) notion of popular sovereignty, articulated by the English philosopher John Locke and others. Locke argued that political authority did not derive from the divine right of kings or the inherited authority of aristocracies but, rather, from the consent of the governed. A related Enlightenment idea was the concept of individual freedom, which challenged the traditional belief that governments had the right to prescribe the way people act, speak, and even think. Champions of individual freedom in the eighteenth century—among them the French philosopher Voltaire—advocated religious toleration and freedom of thought and expression. The Swiss-French Enlightenment theorist Jean-Jacques Rousseau helped spread the idea of political and legal equality for all people—the end of special privileges for aristocrats and elites, the right of all citizens to participate in the formation of policies and laws.
The American Revolution was the first and in many ways the most influential of the Enlightenment-derived uprisings against established orders. It served as an inspiration to people in other lands who were trying to find a way to oppose unpopular regimes. In 1789, a little over a decade after the beginning of the American Revolution, revolution began in France. The monarchy was abolished (and the king and queen publicly executed in 1793), the authority of the Catholic Church was challenged and greatly weakened, and at the peak of revolutionary chaos during the Jacobin period (1793-1794), more than 40,000 suspected enemies of the revolution were executed and hundreds of thousands of others imprisoned. The most radical phase of the revolution came to an end in 1799, when Napoleon Bonaparte, a young general, seized power and began to build a new French empire. But France's ancien regime of king and aristocracy never wholly revived.
The American and French Revolutions helped inspire uprisings in many other parts of the Atlantic world,
Weakening of the Anglican Church
ended, those who had been wealthy at its beginning were, for the most part, still wealthy at the end. Most of those who had wielded social and political influence continued to wield it.
The war had a significant effect on other minorities as well, and on certain religious groups in particular. No sect suffered more than the Anglicans, many of whom were Loyalists. In Virginia and Maryland, where the colonial governments had recognized Anglicanism as the official religion and had imposed a tax for its maintenance, the new Revolutionary regimes disestablished the Anglican Church and
eliminated the subsidy. By the time the fighting ended, many Anglican parishes no longer had clergymen, for there were few ministers to take the place of those who had died or who had left the country as Loyalist refugees. Anglicanism survived in America, but the losses during the Revolution permanently weakened it. The Revolution also weakened the Quakers in Pennsylvania and elsewhere. They incurred widespread unpopularity because of their pacifism, which destroyed much of the social and political prestige they had once enjoyed.
While the war was weakening the Anglicans and the Quakers, it was strengthening the position of the Roman
144
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
» 145 In 1791, a major slave uprising began in Haiti and soon attracted more than 100,000 rebels. The slave army defeated both the white settlers of the island and the French colonial armies sent to quell their rebellion. Linder the leadership of General Toussaint L'Ouverture, they began to agitate for independence, which they obtained on January 1, 1804, a few months after Toussaint's death.
Revolution spread next into the Spanish and Portuguese colonies in the Americas, particularly among the so-called Creoles, people of European ancestry born in the Americas. In the late eighteenth century, they began to resist the authority of colonial officials sent from Spain and Portugal and to demand a greater say in governing their own lands. Napoleon's invasion of Spain and Portugal in 1807 weakened the ability of the European regimes to sustain authority over their American colonies. In the years that followed, revolutions swept through much of Latin America. Mexico became an independent nation in 1821, and provinces of Central America that had once been part of Mexico (Guatemala, El Salvador, Honduras, Nicaragua, and Costa Rica) established their independence three years later. Simon Bolivar, modeling his efforts on those of George Washington, led a great revolutionary movement that won independence for Brazil in 1822 and also helped lead revolutionary campaigns in Venezuela, Ecuador, and Peru—all of which won their independence in the 1820s. Across the Atlantic, Greek patriots—drawing from the examples of other revolutionary nations— launched a movement to win their independence from the Ottoman Empire, which finally succeeded in 1830.
The age of revolutions left many new, independent nations in its wake. It did not, however, succeed in establishing the ideals of popular sovereignty, individual freedom, and political equality in all the nations it affected. Slavery survived in the United States and in many areas of Latin America. New forms of aristocracy and even monarchy emerged in France, Mexico, Brazil, and elsewhere. Women—many of whom had hoped the revolutionary age would win new rights for them—made few legal or political gains in this era. But the ideals that the revolutionary era introduced to the Western world continued to shape the histories of nations throughout the nineteenth century and beyond. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	How did the American Revolution influence the French Revolution?
2.	What other nations were affected by the example of the American Revolution?
3.	What was the significance of the revolution in Haiti, and how much attention did it get in other nations?
Catholic Church. On the advice of Charles Carroll of Carrollton,
a Maryland statesman and Catholic lay leader, most American
c	Catholics supported the Patriot cause
Strengthening	’
of the Catholic Church
during the war. The French alliance brought Catholic troops and chaplains to the country, and the gratitude with vhich most Americans greeted them did much to erode old tnd bitter hostilities toward Catholics. The Catholic Church lid not greatly increase its numbers as a result of the devolution, but it did gain considerable strength as an institu-•ion. Not long after the end of the war, the Vatican provided
the United States with its own Catholic hierarchy. (Until then, Catholic bishops in Europe had controlled the American church.) Father John Carroll (also of Maryland) was named head of Catholic missions in America in 1784 and, in 1789, the first American bishop. In 1808 he became archbishop of Baltimore.
The War and Slavery
African
American Desire for Freedom
For the largest of America's minorities-the African American population-the war had limited, but nevertheless profound, significance. For some, it meant freedom, because many slaves took advantage of the British presence in the South in the final years of the war to escape. The British enabled many of them to leave the country-not so much as any principled commitment to emancipation, but more as a way of disrupting the American war effort. In South Carolina, for example, nearly a third of all slaves defected during the war. Africans had constituted over 60 percent of the population in 1770; by 1790, that figure had declined to about 44 percent.
For other African Americans, the Revolution meant an increased exposure to the concept, although seldom to the reality, of liberty. Most black Americans could not read, but few could avoid the new and exciting ideas circulating through the towns and cities and even at times on the plantations. The results included incidents in several communities in which African Americans engaged in open
resistance to white control. In Charles Town, South Carolina, for example, Thomas Jeremiah, a free black, was executed in 1775 after Patriot leaders accused him of conspiring to smuggle British guns to South Carolina slaves. The Revolution also produced some eloquent efforts by black writers (mostly in the North) to articulate its lessons for their people. "Liberty is a jewel which was handed Down to man from the cabinet of heaven.” the black New Englander Lemuel Hayes wrote in 1776. "Even an African has Equally good a right to his Liberty in common with Englishmen.... Shall a man’s Couler Be the Decisive Criterion wherby to Judg of his natural right?”
That was one reason why in South Carolina and Georgia-where slaves constituted half or more of the population-there was great ambivalence about the Revolution. Slaveowners opposed British efforts to emancipate their slaves, but they also feared that the Revolution itself would foment slave rebellions. The same fears helped prevent English colonists in the Caribbean islands (who were far more greatly outnumbered by African slaves) from joining with the continental Americans in the revolt against Britain. In much of the North, the combination of Revolutionary sentiment and evangelical Christian fervor helped spread antislavery sentiments widely through society. But in the South, white support for slavery survived. Southern churches rejected the antislavery ideas of the North and worked instead to develop a rationale for slavery-in part by reinforcing ideas about white superiority, in part by encouraging slaveowners to make slavery more humane.
146 * CHAPTER 5
As in so many other periods of American history, the Revolution exposed the continuing tension between the nation’s commitment to liberty and its commitment to slavery. To people in our time, and even to some people in Revolutionary times, it seems obvious that liberty and slavery are incompatible. But to many white Americans in the eighteenth century, especially in the South, that did not seem obvious. Many white southerners believed, in fact, that enslaving Africans-whom they considered inferior and unfit for citizenship-was the best way to ensure liberty for white people. They feared the impact
Tension between of free black PeoPle livin§ alonSslde
Liberty and	whites. They also feared that without
Slavery	slaves, it would be necessary to recruit a
servile white workforce in the South, and that the resulting inequalities would jeopardize the survival of liberty. One of the ironies of the American Revolution, therefore, was that white Americans were fighting both to secure freedom for themselves and to preserve slavery for others.
Native Americans
and the Revolution
Most Indians viewed the American Revolution with considerable uncertainty. The American Patriots tried to persuade them to remain neutral in the conflict, which they described as a "family quarrel” between the colonists and Britain that had nothing to do with the tribes.
But in fact a great deal was at stake for Native Americans in the American Revolution. During the colonial period, the British government struggled for many years to restrain the growth of white migration into the Indian lands west of the Appalachian Mountains. Such efforts were mostly unsuccessful. The white colonists, the royal governor of Virginia wrote, "do not conceive that the government has any right to forbid taking possession of a vast tract of country.” But the British believed that the government did have a right to protect the lands of the Indians-not because of benevolence, but because of their desire to avoid further battles with the tribes, especially on land that had been promised to the Indians.
Once the Revolutionary War began, the role of the Indians became of critical significance to both sides of the conflict. For the American Patriots, among the goals of battle for independence was their right to expand into the western lands, at the expense of the Indians. Some of the most eminent figures in the new nation were themselves land speculators in the west, among them George Washington, and many such men had long complained about the Proclamation of 1763, which had forbidden white movement into tribal lands. Other colonial grievances against the British included the recruitment of Indians to join the Royal Army. In fact, both sides tried to recruit Indians to help them.
In the western Carolinas and Virginia, a Cherokee faction led by Dragging Canoe attacked outlying white settlements in the summer of 1776. Patriot militias responded with overwhelming force, ravaging Cherokee lands and forcing Dragging Canoe and many of his followers to flee west across the
Tennessee River. Those Cherokees who remained behind agreed to a new treaty by which they gave up still more land. Not all Native American military efforts were so unsuccessful. Some Iroquois, despite the setbacks at Oriskany, continued to wage war against white Americans in the West and caused widespread destruction in large agricultural areas of New York and Pennsylvania-areas whose crops were of crucial importance to the Patriot cause. And although the retaliating United States armies inflicted heavy losses on the Indians, the attacks continued throughout the war.
In the end, however, the Revolution generally weakened the position of Native Americans in several ways. The Patriot victory increased the white demand for western lands; many American whites associated restrictions on settlement with British oppression and expected the new nation to remove the obstacles. At the same time, white attitudes toward the tribes, seldom friendly in the best of times, took a turn for Taking Sides the worse- Many whites deeply resented the assistance the Mohawk and other
Indian nations had given the British and insisted on treating them as conquered people. Others adopted a paternalistic
,	ueorge Komney painted this portr
Joseph Brant, Chtef of the Mohawks, 1742-1807, to depict the Mohawk leader who led lour the six Iroquois nations against the American forces in support of the British. He achieved a
VIIm' Pkeputa\/°II after partlClpatin9 In the Batt,e °f Oriskany and a raid against the fortific vdlage of Cherry Valley, New York. (© National Gallery of Canada. Ottawa, Ontano. Canada,The □ridgeman Art Library)
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION - 147
view of the tribes that was only slightly less dangerous to them. Thomas Jefferson, for example, came to view the Native Americans as 'noble savages” uncivilized in their present state but redeemable if they were willing to adapt to the norms of white society.
Among the tribes themselves, the Revolution both revealed and increased the deep divisions that made it difficult for them to form a common front to resist the growing power of whites. In 1774, for example, the Shawnee Indians in west-Growing ern Virginia had attempted to lead an up-Divisions rising against white settlers moving into
AMONG THE
the lands that would later become Indians Kentucky. They attracted virtually no al- lies and (in a conflict known as Lord
Dunmore’s War) were defeated by the colonial militia and forced to cede more land to white settlers. And the Iroquois, whose power had been eroding since the end of the French and Indian War, were similarly unable to act in unison in the Revolution.
Bands of Native Americans continued to launch raids against white settlers on the frontier. White militias, often using such raids as pretexts, continued to attack Indian tribes who stood in the way of expansion. Perhaps the most vicious massacre of the era occurred in 1782, after the British surrender, when white militias slaughtered a peaceful band of Delaware Indians at Gnadenhuetten in Ohio. They claimed to be retaliating for the killing of a white family several days before, but few white settlers believed this band of Delaware (who were both Christian converts and pacifists) had played any role in the earlier attack. The white soldiers killed ninety-six people, including many women and children. Such massacres did not become the norm of Indian-white relations. But they did reveal how little the Revolution had done to settle the basic conflict between the two peoples.
The triumph of the American patriots in the Revolution contributed to the ultimate defeat of the Indian tribes. To white Americans, independence meant, among other things, their right to move aggressively into the western lands, despite the opposition of the Indians. To the Indians, American independence was "the greatest blow that could have been dealt us,” one tribal leader warned.
Women's Rights and Women’s Roles
The long Revolutionary War, which touched the lives of people in almost every region, naturally had a significant effect on American women. The departure of so many men to fight in the Patriot armies left wives, mothers, sisters, and daughters in charge of farms and businesses. Other women whose husbands or fathers went off to war did not have even a farm or shop to fall back on. Many cities and towns developed significant populations of impoverished women, who on occasion led popular protests against price increases. On a few occasions, hungry women rioted and looted for food. Elsewhere (in New Jersey and on Staten Island), women launched attacks on occupying
British troops, whom they were required to house and feed at considerable expense.
Not all women, however, stayed behind when the men went off to war. Sometimes by choice, but more often out of economic necessity or because they had been driven from
Women of	their homes by the enemy (and by the
the Army	smallpox and dysentery the British army
carried with it), women flocked in increasing numbers to the camps of the Patriot armies to join their male relatives. George Washington looked askance at these female "camp followers,” convinced that they were disruptive and distracting (even though his own wife, Martha, spent the winter of 1778-1779 with him at Valley Forge). Other officers were even more hostile, voicing complaints that reflected a high level of anxiety over this seeming violation of traditional gender roles (and also, perhaps, over the generally lower-class backgrounds of the camp women). One described them in decidedly hostile terms: "their hair falling, their brows beady with the heat, their belongings slung over one shoulder, chattering and yelling in sluttish shrills as they went.” In fact, however, the women were of significant value to the new army. It had not yet developed an adequate system of supply and auxiliary services, and it profited greatly from the presence of women, who increased army morale and performed
such necessary tasks as cooking, laundry, and nursing.
But female activity did not always remain restricted to "women’s” tasks. In the rough environment of the camps, traditional gender distinctions proved difficult to maintain. Considerable numbers of women became involved, at least intermittently, in combat-including the legendary Molly Pitcher (so named because she carried pitchers of water to soldiers on the battlefield). She watched her husband fall during one encounter and immediately took his place at a field gun. A few women even disguised themselves as men so as to be able to fight.
After the war, of course, the soldiers and the female camp followers returned home. The experience of combat had little visible impact on how society (or on how women themselves) defined female roles in peacetime. The Revolution did, however, call certain assumptions about women into question in other ways. The emphasis on liberty and the "rights of man” led some women to begin to question their position in society as well. "By the way,” Abigail Adams wrote to her husband, John Adams, in 1776, "in the new code of laws which I suppose it will be necessary for you to make, I desire you would remember the ladies and be more generous and favorable to them than your ancestors.”
Adams was calling for a very modest expansion of women’s rights. She wanted new protections against abusive and tyrannical men. A few women, however, went further. Judith Sargent Murray, one of the leading essayists of the late eighteenth century, wrote in 1779 that women’s minds were as good as men’s and that girls as well as boys therefore deserved access to education.
Some political leaders-among them Benjamin Franklin and Benjamin Rush-also voiced support for the education
148 ♦ CHAPTER 5
Calls for Women’s Rights
of women and for other feminist reforms. Yale students in the 1780s debated the question "Whether women ought to be admitted into the magistracy and government of empires and republics/’ And there was for a time wide discussion of the future role of women in a new re-
public that had broken with so many other traditions already. But few concrete reforms became either law or common social practice.
In colonial society, under the doctrines of English common law, an unmarried woman had some legal rights (to own property, to enter contracts, and others), but a married woman had virtually no rights. She could own no property and earn no independent wages; everything she owned and everything she earned belonged to her husband. She had no legal authority over her children; the father was, in the eyes of the law, the autocrat of the family. Because a married woman had no property rights, she could not engage in any legal transactions (buying or selling, suing or being sued, writing wills). She could not vote. Nor could she obtain a divorce in most states; that, too, was a right reserved mostly for men, although in much of the South men could not obtain divorces either. These restrictions were what Abigail Adams (who herself enjoyed a successful marriage) was describing when she appealed
to her husband not to put "such unlimited power into the hands of the Husbands.”
The Revolution did little to change any of these legal customs. In some states, it did become easier for women to obtain divorces. And in New Jersey, women obtained the right to vote (although that right was repealed in 1807). Otherwise, there were few advances and some setbacks-including widows’ loss of the right to regain their dowries from their husbands’ estates. That change left many widows without any means of support and was one of the reasons for the increased agitation for female education: such women needed a way to support themselves.
The Revolution, in other words, far from challenging the patriarchal structure of American society, actually confirmed and strengthened it. Few American women challenged the belief that they occupied a special sphere distinct from that of men. Most accepted that their place remained in the family. Nevertheless, the Revolutionary experience did contribute to a subtle but important alteration of women’s roles. In the past, they had often been little better than servants in their husbands’ homes. But the Revolution encouraged people of both genders to reevaluate the contribution of women to the family and the society.
One reason for this was a reevaluation of American life during and after the Revolutionary struggle. As the republic
THE BRITISH INFANTRY
The worlds greatest military power raised its armies in almost haphazard fashion Command of a British - • . received a cash reward for every man they enlisted. With that incentive, they were hardly picky, and the foot soldiers of the British army were mo	' T'° "e"'P°Siti°ned gen"emen' who
enlisting through a combination of liquor and cash. Even so, the rough-and-ready quality of the British infantrv made them need u *	, V men Wh° ““ d be Persuaded (°r tricked) in,°
during the American Revolution. As with the colonial armies, the Brihsh troops attrected women, seen ^f^^	™S drawi"9 W a British encampment
themselves wore highly ornamental uniforms that were	in many ways very impractical	To keeD himself nmnerlv	j .	P ollowers, doing chores to help the soldiers. The soldiers
Military Collection, Brown University Library)	' P	P mSel'	9r°°med	and a,,lrad	could take a soldier up to three hours a day. (© Anne S.K. Brown
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
• 149 searched for a cultural identity for itself, it began to place additional value on the role of women as mothers. The new nation
A
Strengthened waS’ many Americans liked to believe, Patriarchal producing a new kind of citizen, steeped
Structure in the principles of liberty. Mothers had a particularly important task, therefore, in instructing their children in the virtues the republican citizenry was expected now to possess. Wives were still far from equal partners in marriage, but their ideas, interests, and do-
mestic roles received increased respect from many men.
The War Economy
Inevitably, the Revolution produced important changes in the structure of the American economy. After more than a century of dependence on the British imperial system, American trade suddenly found itself on its own. No longer did it have the protection of the great British navy; on the contrary, English ships now attempted to drive American vessels from the seas. No longer did American merchants have access to the markets of the empire; those markets were now hostile ports-lnclud-ing, of course, the most important source of American trade: England itself.
Yet, while the Revolution disrupted traditional economic patterns, in the long run it strengthened the American economy. Well before the war was over, American ships had learned to evade the British navy with light, fast, easily maneuverable vessels. Indeed, the Yankees began to prey on British commerce with hundreds of privateers. For many shipowners, privateering proved to be more profitable than ordinary peacetime trade. More important in the long run, the end of imperial restrictions on American shipping opened up enormous
new areas of trade to the nation. Enterprising merchants in New England and elsewhere began to develop new commerce in the Caribbean and in South America. By the mid-1780s, American merchants were developing an important new pattern of trade with Asia; and by the end of that decade, Yankee ships were regularly sailing from the eastern seaboard around Cape Horn to the Pacific coast of North America, there exchanging manufactured goods for hides and furs, and then proceeding across the Pacific to barter for goods in China. There was also a substantial increase in trade among the American states.
When English imports to America were cut off-first by the prewar boycott, then by the war itself-there were desperate New Patterns efforts throughout the states to stimulate of Trade domestic manufacturing of certain necessities. No great industrial expansion resulted, but there were several signs of the economic growth that was to come in the next century. Americans began to make their own cloth "homespun,” which became both patriotic and fashionable-to replace now-unobtainable British fabrics. It would be some time before a large domestic textile industry would emerge, but the nation was never again to rely exclusively on foreign sources for its cloth. There was, of course, pressure to build factories for the manufacture of guns and ammunition. And there was a growing general awareness that America need not forever be dependent on other nations for
manufactured goods.
The war stopped well short of revolutionizing the American economy; not until the nineteenth century would that begin to occur. But it did serve to release a wide range of entrepreneurial energies that, despite the temporary dislocations, encouraged growth and diversification.
BANNER OF THE SOCIETY OF
PEWTERERS
Members of the American Society of Pewterers carried this patriotic banner when they marched in a New York City parade in July 1788. Its inscription celebrates the adoption of the new federal Constitution and predicts a future of prosperity and freedom in "Columbia’s Land." The banner also suggests the growing importance of American manufacturing, which had received an important boost during the Revolution when British imports became unavailable. (© Collection of the New-York Historical Society, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library International) 150
CHAPTER 5
THE CREATION OF STATE
GOVERNMENTS
At the same time that Americans were struggling to win their independence on the battlefield, they were also struggling to create new institutions of government to replace the British system they had repudiated. That struggle continued for more than fifteen years, but its most important phase occurred during the war itself, at the state level.
The Assumptions of Republicanism
If Americans agreed on nothing else when they began to build new governments for themselves, they agreed that those governments would be republican. To them, that meant a political system in which all power came from the people, rather than from some supreme authority (such as a king). The success of such a government depended on the nature of its citizenry, j	If the population consisted of sturdy, inde-
Civic Virtue pendent property owners imbued with civic virtue, then the republic could survive. If it consisted of a few powerful aristocrats and a great mass of dependent workers, then it would be in danger. From the beginning, therefore, the ideal of the small freeholder (the independent landowner) was basic to American political
ideology.
Another crucial part of that ideology was the concept of equality. The Declaration of Independence had given voice to that idea in its most ringing phrase: "All men are created equal.” It was a belief that stood in direct contrast to the old European assumption of an inherited aristocracy. The innate talents and energies of individuals, not their positions at birth, would determine their roles in society. Some people would inevitably be wealthier and more powerful than others. But all people would have to earn their success. There would be no equality of condition, but there would be equality of opportunity.
In reality, of course, the United States was never a nation in which all citizens were independent property holders. From the beginning, there was a sizable dependent labor force. White laborers enjoyed some of the privileges of citizenship.
Persistent Black workers were allowed virtually none.
Inequality American women remained both politically and economically subordinate. Native
Americans were systematically exploited and displaced. Nor was there ever full equality of opportunity. American society was more open and more fluid than the societies of most European nations, but the condition of a person’s birth was almost always a crucial determinant of success.
Nevertheless, in embracing the assumptions of republicanism, Americans were adopting a powerful, even revolutionary, ideology, and their experiment in statecraft became a model for many other countries. It made the United States for a time the most admired and studied nation on earth.
The First State Constitutions
The first and perhaps most basic decision about the character of government was that the constitutions were to be written down, because Americans believed the
Written vagueness of England’s unwritten constitu-
CandTStrongS tion had Produced corruption. The second Legislatures decision was that the power of the executive, which Americans believed had grown too great in England, must be limited. Pennsylvania eliminated the executive altogether. Most other states inserted provisions that limited the power of governors to make appointments and veto legislation. Most states also prevented governors from dismissing the legislature. Most important, every state forbade the governor or any other executive officer from holding a seat in the legislature, thus ensuring that, unlike in
England, the executive and legislative branches of government would remain wholly separate.
But the new constitutions did not embrace direct popular rule. In Georgia and Pennsylvania, the legislature consisted of one popularly elected house. But in every other state, there was an upper and a lower chamber, and in most cases, the upper chamber was designed to represent the "higher orders” of society. There were property requirements for voters-some modest, some substantial-in all states.
Revising State Governments
By the late 1770s, many Americans were growing concerned about the apparent divisiveness and instability of their new state governments. Most states were having trouble accomplishing anything. Many believed the problem was one of too much democracy. As a result, most of the states began to revise their constitutions to limit popular power. Massachusetts, which waited until 1780 to ratify its first constitution, was the first to act on the new concerns.
Two changes in particular differentiated the Massachusetts and later constitutions from the earlier ones. The first was a change in the process of constitution writing itself. Most of the first documents had been written by state legislatures and thus could easily be amended (or violated) by them. Massachusetts and, later, other states sought a way to protect the constitutions from ordinary politics and created the constitutional convention: a special assembly of the people that would meet only for the purpose of writing the constitution and that would never (except under extraordinary circumstances) meet again.
The second change was a significant strengthening of the executive, a reaction to what many Americans believed was the instability of the original state governments that had weak governors. The 1780 Massachusetts constitution made the governor one of the strongest in any
Strom^	state. He was to be elected directly by the
Executives	people; he was to have a fixed salary (in
°ther words, he would not be dependent
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION . 151
on the goodwill of the legislature each year for his wages); he would have significant appointment powers and a veto over legislation. Other states followed. Those with weak or nonexistent upper houses strengthened or created them. Most increased the powers of the governor. Pennsylvania, which had no executive at first, now produced a strong one. By the late 1780s, almost every state had either revised its constitution or drawn up a new one in an effort to produce stability in government.
Toleration and Slavery
The states moved far in the direction of complete religious freedom. Most Americans continued to believe that religion Statute of	should play some role in government, but
Religious	rhey did not wish to give special powers to
Liberty any particular denomination. The privileges that churches had once enjoyed were now largely stripped away. In 1786, Virginia enacted the Statute
A FREE BLACK MAN
John Singleton Copley, the great American portraitist of the Revolutionary age, painted this picture of a young African American in 1777-1978. He was probably a worker on New England fishing boats who appeared in another Copley painting (Watson and the Shark). It is one of a small number of portrayals of the free blacks in the North in this era, and one of even a smaller number that portrays them realistically and seriously. [Head of a Negro. 1777-1778. By John Singleton Copley. Oil on canvas, 53.3 X 41.3 cm. Founders Society Purchase, Gibbs-Williams Fund. Photograph © Detroit Institute of Arts, USA/The Bridgeman Art Lib y
of Religious Liberty, written by Thomas Jefferson, which called for the complete separation of church and state.
More difficult to resolve was the question of slavery. In areas where slavery was already weak-in New England, where there had never been many slaves, and in Pennsylvania, where the Quakers opposed slavery-it was abolished relatively early. Even in the South, there were some pressures to amend or even eliminate the institution; every state but South Carolina and Georgia prohibited further importation of slaves from abroad, and South Carolina banned the slave trade during the war. Virginia passed a law encouraging manumission (the freeing of slaves).
Nevertheless, slavery survived in all the southern and border states. There were several reasons: racist assumptions among whites about the inferiority of blacks; the enormous economic investments many white southerners had in their slaves; and the inability of even such men as Washington and Jefferson, who had moral misgivings about slavery, to envision any alternative to it. If slavery were abolished, what would happen to the black people in America? Few whites believed blacks could be integrated into American society as equals. In maintaining slavery, Jefferson once remarked, Americans were holding a "wolf by the ears.” However unappealing it was to hold on to it, letting go would be even worse.
THE SEARCH FOR A
NATIONAL GOVERNMENT
Americans were much quicker to agree on state institutions than they were on the structure of their national government. At first, most believed that the central government should remain a relatively weak and unimportant force and that each state would be virtually a sovereign nation. It was in response to such ideas that the Articles of Confederation emerged.
The Confederation
The Articles of Confederation, which the Continental Congress had adopted in 1777, provided for a national government much like the one already in place. Congress wrote for ratification of the Articles: "Permit us, then, earnestly to recommend these articles to the immediate and dispassionate attention of the legislatures of the respective states. Let them be candidly reviewed under a sense of the difficulty of combining in one system the various sentiments and interests of a continent divided into so many sovereign and independent communities, under a conviction of the absolute necessity of uniting all our councils and all our strengths, to maintain and defend our common liberties.”
Under the Articles, Congress remained the central-indeed the only-institution of national authority. Its powers expanded to give it authority to conduct wars and foreign relations
152 . CHAPTER 5
Limited Power of the National Government
and to appropriate, borrow, and issue money. But it did not have power to regulate trade, draft troops, or levy taxes directly on the people. For troops and taxes, it had to make formal requests to the state legislatures, which could-and often did-refuse them. There was no separate executive; the "president of the United States” was merely the presiding officer at the sessions of
Congress. Each state had a single vote in Congress, and at least nine of the states had to approve the admission of a new state. All thirteen state legislatures had to approve any amendment of the Articles.
During the process of ratifying the Articles of Confederation (which required approval by all thirteen states), broad disagreements over the plan became evident. The small states had insisted on equal state representation, but the larger states wanted representation to be based on population. The smaller states prevailed on that issue. More important, the states claiming western lands wished to keep them, but the rest of the states
demanded that all such territory be turned over to the national government. New York and Virginia had to give up their western claims before the Articles were finally approved. They went into effect in 1781.
The Confederation, which existed from 1781 until 1789, was not a complete failure, but it was far from a success. It lacked adequate powers to deal with interstate issues or to enforce its will on the states, and it had little stature in the eyes of the world.
Diplomatic Failures
Evidence of the low esteem in which the rest of the world held the Confederation was its difficulty in persuading Great Britain (and to a lesser extent Spain) to live up to the terms of the peace treaty of 1783.
The British had promised to evacuate
American territory, but British forces continued to occupy
Postwar Disputes with Britain and Spain
/ MAINE
7 (MASS.) > /
-LmeW HAMPSHIRl
'CONNECTICUT
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
/ Ceded by Spain, 1795 \ Ceded by Georgia, 1802 f
1
V"; MASSACHUSETTS
w
RHODE ISLAND
THE CONFLICT OVER WESTERN LANDS
The American victory in the Revolution transformed the colonies into "states" within a new nation whose central government claimed at least some sovereignty over the individual units. An early conflict between national and state power took place over the state claims to western lands—claims established during the colonial period. This map shows the extensive western lands claimed by most of the original thirteen colonies to land in the West, and it illustrates the shifting nature of those claims over time—as colonies and then states transferred land to one another. The new national government gradually persuaded the states to give it control of the western lands, and in 1784 and 1785 it issued ordinances governing the process of settling those lands.
• Why did the national government consider it important for the states to give up their claim to these territories?
Ceded by Spain to France 1800	<
Sold by France to United States 1803
Gulf o f Mexico
States after land cessions
Ceded territory
Territory ceded by New York, 1782






THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
• 153 a string of frontier posts along the Great Lakes within the United States. Nor did the British honor their agreement to make restitution to slaveowners whose slaves the British army had confiscated. There were also disputes over the boundaries of the new nation. Americans wanted full access to British markets, England, however, placed sharp restrictions on that access.
In 1784, Congress sent John Adams as minister to London to resolve these differences, but Adams made no headway with the English, who were never sure whether he represented a single nation or thirteen different ones. Throughout the 1780s, the British government refused even to send a diplomatic minister to the American capital.
The Confederation and
the Northwest
The Confederation’s most important accomplishment was its resolution of controversies over the western lands. When the Revolution began, only a few thousand whites lived west of the Appalachian mountains; but by 1790 their numbers had increased to 120,000. The Confederation had to find a way to include these new settlements in the political structure of the nation. The landed states began to yield their western claims to the national government in 1781, and by 1784 the Confederation controlled enough land to permit Congress to begin making policy for the western lands.
the TREATY OF GREENVILLE ON AUGUST 3, 1795 This painting, from the American School of painting, depicts the Treaty of Greenville ending the Northeast Indian War in the Ohio r L .	r	.	,	.	,	’ . o kUnUatQ i itpnqils and domesticated animals, the United States acquired large parts of Ohio, tracts of what would soon become
Country. In exchange for $20,000 worth of various goods such as blankets, utensils, ana aomesmua e
Chicago, and the Fort Detroit area. (© Chicago History Museum, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library)
154 ♦ CHAPTER 5
The
Ordinances of 1784 AND 1785
The Ordinance of 1784, based on a proposal by Thomas Jefferson, divided the western territory into ten self-governing districts, each of which could petition Congress for statehood when its population equaled the number of free inhabitants of the smallest existing state. The provision reflected the desire of the
Revolutionary generation to avoid creating second-class citizens in subordinate territories. Then, in the Ordinance of 1785, Congress created a system for surveying and selling the western lands. The territory north of the Ohio River was to be surveyed and marked off into neat rectangular townships, each divided into thirty-six identical sections. In every township, four sections were to be set aside for the United States; the revenue from the sale of one of the other sections was to support creation of a public school. Sections were to be sold at auction for no less than one dollar an acre.
Among the many important results of the Ordinance of 1785 was the establishment of an enduring pattern of divid-
The Grid in8 UP ^an<^ f°r human use. Many such systems have emerged throughout history. Some have relied on natural boundaries (rivers, mountains, and other topographical features). Some have reflected informal claims of landlords over vast but vaguely defined territories. Some have rested on random allocations of acres, to be determined by individual landholders. But many
Enlightenment thinkers began in the eighteenth century to imagine more precise, even mathematical, forms of land distribution, which required both careful surveying and a clear method for defining boundaries. The result was the method applied in 1785 in the Northwest Territory, which came to be known as "the grid”-the division of land into carefully measured and evenly divided squares or rectangles. This pattern of land distribution eventually became the norm for much of the land west of the Appalachians. It also became a model for the organization of many towns and cities, which distributed land in geometrical patterns within rectangular grids defined by streets. Although older land-distribution systems survive within the United States, the grid has become the most common form by which Americans impose human ownership and
use on the landscape.
The original ordinances were highly favorable to land
Northwest	speculators and less so to ordinary settlers,
Ordinance	many of whom could not afford the price
of the land. Congress compounded the problem by selling much of the best land to the Ohio and Scioto land companies before making it available to anyone else. Criticism of these policies led to the passage in 1787 of another law governing western settlement legislation that became known as the "Northwest Ordinance.” The 1787 Ordinance abandoned the ten districts established in 1784 and created a single Northwest Territory out of the lands
The Seven Ranges First Area Survey GEOGRAPHER'S LINE (BASE LINE)
<u oc - -C-	<u to oc --C-. -		to C£	1 “E
"is 	 Ln	*3-		ro <
			
			
			liiBi a
			
			d
			It
			f /
			
4^			
A			
B		c	
D IE
* Four sections reserved for subsequent sales Section 16 reserved for school funds -
One Section = 640 acres (1 mile square) A Half section = 320 acres B Quarter section = 160 acres C Half-quarter section = 80 acres
-4
NORTHWEST TERRITORY
One township (six miles square)
1	36	30	24	18	12	6
	35	29*	23	17	11*	5
s	34	28	22	16	10	4
	33	27	21	15	9	3
	32	26*	20	14	8*	2
	31	25	19	13	7	1
LAND SURVEY: ORDINANCE OF 1785
In the Ordinance of 1785, the Congress established a new system for surveying and selling western lands. These maps illustrate the way in which the lands were divided in an area of Ohio. Note the highly geometrical grid pattern that the ordinance imposed on these lands. Each of the squares in the map on the left was subdivided into 36 sections, as illustrated in the map at the lower right. * Why was this grid pattern so appealing to the planners of the western lands?
/
1 mile
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
• 155 north of the Ohio; the territory could eventually be divided into between three and five territories. It also specified a population of 60,000 as a minimum for statehood, guaranteed freedom of religion and the right to trial by jury to residents of the Northwest, and prohibited slavery throughout the territory.
The western lands south of the Ohio River received less attention from Congress, and development was more chaotic there. The region that became Kentucky and Tennessee developed rapidly in the late 1770s, and in the 1780s speculators and settlers began setting up governments and asking for recognition as states. The Confederation was never able to successfully resolve the conflicting claims in that region.
Indians and the Western Lands
On paper at least, the western land policies of the Confederation created a system that brought order and stability to the process of white settlement in the Northwest. But in reality, order and stability came slowly and at great cost, because much of the land the Confederation was neatly subdividing and offering for sale consisted of territory claimed by the Indians of the region. Congress tried to resolve that problem in 1784, 1785, and 1786 by persuading Iroquois, Choctaw, Chickasaw, and Cherokee leaders to sign treaties ceding substantial western lands in the North and South to the United States. But those agreements proved ineffective. In 1786, the leadership of the Iroquois Confederacy repudiated the treaty it had signed two years earlier and threatened to attack white settlements in the disputed lands. Other tribes had never accepted the treaties affecting them and continued to resist white movement into their lands.
Violence between whites and Indians on the Northwest frontier reached a crescendo in the early 1790s. In 1790 and again in 1791, a group of tribes led by the famed Miami war-
D	rior Little Turtle defeated United States
Fallen	forces in two major battles near what is
Timbers	now the western border of Ohio; in the
second of those battles, on November 4,
1791, 630 white Americans died in fighting at the Wabash River (the greatest military victory Indians had ever or would ever again achieve in their battles with whites). Efforts to negotiate a settlement failed because of the Miami’s insistence that no treaty was possible unless it forbade white settlement west of the Ohio River. Negotiations did not resume until after General Anthony Wayne led 4,000 soldiers into the Ohio Valley in 1794 and defeated the Indians in the Battle of Fallen Timbers.
A year later, the Miami signed the Treaty of Greenville, ceding substantial new lands to the United States (which was now operating under the Constitution of 1789) in exchange for a formal acknowledgment of their claim to the territory they had managed to retain. In doing so, the United States was affirming that Indian lands could be ceded only by the tribes themselves. That hard-won assurance, however, proved a frail
protection against the pressure of white expansion westward in later years.
Debts, Taxes, and Daniel Shays
The postwar depression, which lasted from 1784 to 1787, in-
Postwar	creased the perennial American problem of
Depression	an inadequate money supply, a problem
that weighed particularly heavily on debtors. In dealing with this problem, Congress most clearly
demonstrated its weakness.
The Confederation itself had an enormous outstanding debt that it had accumulated at home and abroad during the Revolutionary War. It had few means with which to pay it, having no power to tax. It could only make requisitions of the states, and it received only about one-sixth of the money it requisitioned. The fragile new nation was faced with the grim prospect of defaulting on its obligations.
This alarming possibility brought to the fore a group of leaders who would play a crucial role in the shaping of the
LITTLE TURTLE
Little Turtle led the Miami confederacy in its wars with the United States in what is now Ohio and Indiana in the early 1790s. For a time he seemed almost invincible, but in 1794 Little Turtle was defeated in the Battle of Fallen Timbers. In this sketch (a rough copy of a painting attributed to Gilbert Stuart), Little Turtle wears a medal bearing the likeness of George Washington, awarded him by the United States after the signing of the Treaty of Greenville. (© The Granger Collection, New York)
156 * CHAPTER 5
DANIEL SHAYS AND JOB SHATTUCK
Shays and Shattuck were the principal leaders of the 1786 uprising by poor farmers in Massachusetts demanding relief from their indebtedness. Shattuck led an insurrection in the east, which collapsed when he was captured on November 30. Shays organized the rebellion in the west, which continued until the state militia dispersed the rebels in late February 1787. The following year, state authorities pardoned Shays; even before that, the legislature responded to the rebellion by providing some relief to the impoverished farmers. These drawings are part of a hostile account of the rebellion published in 1787 in a Boston almanac. (© The Granger Collection, New York) republic for several decades. Committed nationalists, they sought ways to increase the powers of the central government and to meet its financial obligations. Robert Morris, the head of the Confederation’s treasury; Alexander Hamilton, his young protege; James Madison of Virginia; and others called for a "continental impost”-a 5 percent duty on imported goods to be levied by Congress and used to fund the debt. Many Americans, however, feared that the
impost plan would concentrate too much financial power in the hands of Morris and his allies in Philadelphia. Congress failed to approve the impost in 1781 and again in 1783. Angry and discouraged, the nationalists largely withdrew from any active involvement in the Confederation.
Political Disputes over Economic Issues
The states had war debts, too, and they generally relied on increased taxation to pay them. But poor farmers, already burdened by debt and now burdened again by new taxes, considered such policies unfair, even tyrannical. They demanded that the state governments issue paper currency to increase the money supply and make it easier for them to meet their obligations. Resentment was especially high among farmers in New England, who felt that the states were squeezing them to enrich already wealthy bondholders in Boston and other towns.
Throughout the late 1780s, therefore, mobs of distressed farmers rioted periodically in various parts of New England. Dissidents in the Connecticut Valley and the Berkshire Hills of Massachusetts, many of them Revolutionary veterans, ral-Shays’s	Hed behind Daniel Shays, a former captain
Rebellion in the Continental army. Shays issued a set of demands that included paper money, tax relief, a moratorium on debts, the relocation of the state capital from Boston to the interior, and the abolition of imprisonment for debt. During the summer of 1786, the Shaysites concentrated on preventing the collection of debts, private or public, and used force to keep courts from sitting and sheriffs from selling confiscated property. In Boston, members of the legislature, including Samuel Adams, denounced Shays and his men as rebels and traitors. When winter came, the rebels advanced on Springfield, hoping to seize weapons from the arsenal there. An army of state militiamen, financed by a loan from wealthy merchants, set out from Boston to confront them. In January 1787, this army met Shays’s band
and dispersed his ragged troops.
As a military enterprise, Shays’s Rebellion was a failure, although it produced some concessions to the aggrieved farmers. Shays and his lieutenants, at first sentenced to death, were later pardoned, and Massachusetts offered the protesters some tax relief and a postponement of debt payments. The rebellion had more important consequences for the future of the United States, however, for it added urgency to a movement already gathering support throughout the new nation the movement to produce a new, national constitution.
LOOKING BACK
Between a small, inconclusive battle on a village green in New England in 1775 and a momentous surrender at Yorktown in 1781, the American people fought a great and terrible war against the mightiest military nation in the world. No one outside America, and few within it, would have predicted in 1775 that the makeshift armies of the colonies could withstand the armies and navies of the British Empire. But a combination of luck, brilliance, determination, and timely aid from abroad allowed the Patriots, as they began to call themselves, to make full use of the advantages of fighting on their home soil and to frustrate British designs time and again.
The war was not just a historic military event. It was also a great political one, for it propelled the colonies to unite, to organize, and—in July 1776-to declare their independence. Having done so, they fought with even greater determination, defending now not just a set of principles, but an actual, fledgling nation. By the end of the war, they had created new governments at both the state and national level and had begun experimenting with new political forms that would distinguish the United States from any previous nation in history.
The war was also important for its effects on American society—for the way it shook (although never overturned) the
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
• 157 existing social order; for the way it caused women to question (although seldom openly to challenge) their place in society; and for the way it spread notions of liberty and freedom throughout a society that in the past had often been rigidly hierarchical and highly deferential. Even African American slaves absorbed some of the ideas of the Revolution, although it would be many years before they would be in any position to make much use of them.
Victory in the American Revolution solved many of the problems of the new nation, but it also produced others.
What should the United States do about its relations with the Indians and with its neighbors to the north and south? What should it do about the distribution of western lands? What should it do about slavery? How should it balance its commitment to liberty with its need for order? These questions bedeviled the new national government in its first years of existence and ultimately led Americans to create a new political order.
People/Places/Events
American Patriots 131 Articles of Confederation 131 Benedict Arnold 134 Common Sense 130
Daniel Shays 156
George Washington 132
Hessians 136
John Burgoyne 136
John Locke 131
Joseph and Mary Brant 138 Lord Cornwallis 141 Loyalists (Tories) 143 Nathanael Greene 141 Olive Branch Petition 129 Prohibitory Act 130 Saratoga 137
Second Continental Congress 129 Thomas Jefferson 130 Thomas Paine 130 Valley Forge 132 William Howe 135 Yorktown 142
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	What questions did the Second Continental Congress debate, and how did it answer them?
2.	What was the impact of Thomas Paine's Common Sense on Americans’ view of the war with Britain?
3.	How and why were the Americans able to prevail in their War for Independence?
4.	What were the ideological ideals of the new state and national governments, and how did those ideals compare with the realities of American society?
5.	What was the purpose of the Articles of Confederation?
6.	How did the Revolution affect the role of religion and the position of churches in American society?
158 - CHAPTER 5
SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
. 1775 .........
Second Continental Congress meets
George Washington appointed to command American forces Battle of Bunker Hi,,
1781
Cornwallis surrenders at Yorktown
Articles of Confederation ratified
Thomas Paine's Common &	J778
Sense published	Batt|e of Trenton
Declaration of Independence	FirSt state constitutions written
debated and signed (July 2—4)
1781-1784
States cede western lands to Confederation
1777
Articles of Confederation adopted
Washington camps at Valley Forge for winter
Burgoyne surrenders to Gates at Saratoga
1784-1785
First ordinances establishing procedures for settling western lands enacted
1783
Treaty of Paris with Great Britain recognizes American
independence
Slavery abolished in Massachusetts
1778
French-American alliance established
War shifts to the South
1787
Northwest Ordinance enacted
1786-1787
Shays's Rebellion in Massachusetts
1780
Cornwallis defeats Gates at Camden, South Carolina
Massachusetts state constitution ratified
Slavery abolished in Pennsylvania
Patriots defeat Tories at King's Mountain, South Carolina
1794
Anthony Wayne defeats Indians in Ohio
THE CONSTITUTION AND THE NEW REPUBLIC
THE AMERICAN STAR
Frederick Kemmelmeyer painted this tribute to George Washington sometime in the 1790s. It was one of many efforts by artists and others to create an iconography for the new republic. (Private Collection/photo © Boltin Picture Library/The Bridgeman Art Library) LOOKING AHEAD
1.	What were the most important questions debated at the Constitutional Convention of 1787, and how were they resolved?
2.	What were the main tenets of the Federalist and Antifederalist arguments on ratification of the Constitution?
3,	What were the origins of America's "first party system"?

SETTING THE STAGE
BY THE LATE 1780s,
most Americans had grown deeply dissatisfied with the Confederation government: with its inability to deal with factions and instability, its powerlessness (as shown in dealing with Shays's Rebellion), and its failure to handle economic problems effectively. A decade earlier, Americans had deliberately avoided creating a strong national government, fearing that it would encroach on the sovereignty of the individual states. Now they reconsidered. In 1787, they produced a new constitution that created a new, powerful national government, The new government created in 1787 has survived for more than two centuries as one of the stablest and most successful in the world. Many Americans have described the Constitution s provisions as unassailable "fundamental law," from which all public policies, all political principles, all solutions of controversies must spring. Yet the adoption of the Constitution did not complete the creation of the republic; it only defined the terms in which debate over the future of government would continue. Americans may have agreed that the Constitution was a nearly perfect document, but they disagreed—at times fundamentally on what that document meant. They still do. Out of such disagreements emerged the first great political battles of the new nation.
FRAMING A NEW GOVERNMENT
So unpopular and ineffectual had the Confederation Congress become by the mid-1780s that it began to lead an almost waiflike existence. In 1783, its members timidly withdrew from Philadelphia to escape from the clamor of army veterans demanding back pay. They took refuge for a while in Princeton,
A
Weak New Jersey, then moved to Annapolis, and in 1785 settled in New York. Through Central delegates were often conspicuous largely by their absence. Only Government with great difficulty did Congress secure a quorum to ratify the treaty with Great Britain ending the Revolutionary War. Eighteen members, representing only eight states, voted on the Confederation's most important piece of legislation, the Northwest Ordinance. In the meantime, a major public debate was beginning over the future of the Confederation.
Advocates of Centralization
Weak and unpopular though the Confederation was, it had for a time satisfied a great many probably a majority-of the people. They believed they had fought the Revolutionary War to avert the danger of what they considered remote and tyrannical authority; now they wanted to keep political power centered in the states, where they could carefully and closely control it.
But during the 1780s, some of the wealthiest and most powerful groups in the country began to clamor for a more genuinely national government capable of dealing with the nation’s problems Supporters of ParticularlV rhe economic problems that most directly afflicted them. Some
a Strong military men, many of them members of the exclusive and hereditary Society of
National	tlle Cincinnati (formed by Revolutionary army officers in 1783), were disgrun-
Government	tied at the refusal of Congress to fund their pensions. They began aspiring to in-
fluence and invigorate the national government; some even envisioned a form of military dictatorship and flirted briefly (in 1783, in the so-called Newburgh Conspiracy) with a direct
challenge to Congress, until George Washington intervened and blocked the potential rebellion.
American manufacturers-the artisans and "mechanics” of the nation’s cities and towns wanted to replace the various state tariffs with a uniformly high national duty Merchants and shippers wanted to replace the thirteen different (and largely ineffective) state commercial policies with a single, national one. Land speculators wanted the "Indian menace” finally removed from their western tracts. People who were owed money wanted to stop the states from issuing paper money, which would lower the value of what they received in payment. Investors in Confederation securities wanted the government to fund the debt and thus enhance the value of their securities. Large property owners looked for protection from the threat of mobs a threat
160 .
THE CONSTITUTION AND THE NEW REPUBLIC
■ 161 GEORGE WASHINGTON AT MOUNT VERNON
Washington was in his first term as president in 1790 when an anonymous folk artist painted this view of his home at Mount Vernon, Virginia. Washington appears in uniform, along with members of his family, on the lawn. After he retired from office in 1797, Washington returned happily to his plantation and spent the two years before his death in 1799 "amusing myself in agricultural and rural pursuits.” He also played host to an endless stream of visitors from throughout the country and Europe. (Courtesy, National Gallery of Art, Washington)
that seemed particularly menacing in light of such episodes as Shays’s Rebellion. This fear of disorder and violence expressed a tension between the resolute defense of individual rights, which was a core principle of the Revolution and found reflection in the Bill of Rights (p. 168), and the public concern for safety and security, which the occasional chaos of the Confederation period had reinforced. Frequent conflicts between liberty and order became, and remain, a central feature of American democracy.
By 1786, these diverse demands had grown so powerful that the issue was no longer whether the Confederation should be changed but how drastic the changes should be. Even the defenders of the existing system reluctantly came to agree that the government needed strengthening at its weakest point—its lack of power to tax.
The most resourceful of the reformers was Alexander Hamilton, political genius, New York lawyer, onetime military aide to General Washington, and illegitimate son of a Scottish Alexander merchant in the West Indies. From the be-
Hamilton ginning, Hamilton had been unhappy with the Articles of Confederation and the weak central government they had created. He now called for a national convention to overhaul the entire document. He found an important ally in James Madison of Virginia, who persuaded
the Virginia legislature to convene an interstate conference on commercial questions. Only five states sent delegates to the meeting, held in Annapolis, Maryland, in 1786; but the delegates approved a proposal drafted by Hamilton (who was representing New York) recommending that Congress call a convention of special delegates from all the states to gather in Philadelphia the next year and consider ways to "render the constitution of the Federal government adequate to the exigencies of the union.”
At that moment, in 1786, there seemed little possibility that the Philadelphia convention would attract any more interest than the meeting at Annapolis had attracted. Only by winning the support of George Washington, the centralizers believed, could they hope to prevail. But Washington at first showed little interest in joining the cause. Then, early in 1787, the news of Shays’s Rebellion spread throughout the nation. Thomas Jefferson, then the American minister in Paris, was not alarmed. T hold,” he confided in a letter to James Madison, "that a little rebellion, now and then, is a good thing, and as necessary in the political world as storms in the physical.” But Washington took the news less calmly. In May, he left his home at Mount Vernon in Virginia for the Constitutional Convention in Philadelphia. His support gave the meeting immediate credibility.
